Maryland, session 2026, HB0895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) “CONSENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) (2) (3) (I) “DYNAMIC PRICING” MEANS THE DISCRIMINATORY
PRACTICE OF VARYING THE PRICES OF CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES WITHIN A
THE SAME BUSINESS DAY BASED ON DEMAND OR OTHER FACTORS OFFERING OR
SETTING A PERSONALIZED PRICE FOR A GOOD OR SERVICE THAT IS SPECIFIC TO A
CONSUMER BASED ON THE CONSUMER’S PERSONAL DATA, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE SELLER COLLECTED OR PURCHASED THE PERSONAL DATA,
INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE OR MODELS THAT
RETRAIN OR RECALIBRATE BASED ON RECEIVED INFORMATION IN NEAR REAL–
TIME.
(II) “DYNAMIC PRICING” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 154
1. THE USE OF PROMOTIONAL PRICING OFFERS,
LOYALTY PROGRAM BENEFITS, OR OTHER TEMPORARY DISCOUNTS OR CHANGES TO
PRICING RELATED TO RETENTION OF EXISTING CUSTOMERS;
2. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON OBJECTIVE COSTS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO PROVIDING CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES TO DIFFERENT
CONSUMERS, SUCH AS A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE CAUSED BY SHIPPING COSTS OR
TAXES BASED ON A CONSUMER’S PHYSICAL LOCATION;
3. A DISCOUNTED PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER
THROUGH A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS DISCLOSURE ON A MERCHANT’S WEBSITE
THAT LISTS ALL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA, THE AVAILABLE DISCOUNT, AND ANY
CONDITIONS FOR RECEIVING OR EARNING THE DISCOUNTED PRICE THAT IS:
A. BASED ON PUBLICLY DISCLOSED ELIGIBILITY
CRITERIA THAT ANY CONSUMER COULD SATISFY, SUCH AS AN ELECTION TO RECEIVE
PROMOTIONAL MATERIALS OR PARTICIPATE IN PROMOTIONAL EVENTS;
B. OFFERED TO MEMBERS OF A BROADLY DEFINED
GROUP, INCLUDING TEACHERS, ACTIVE OR RETIRED SERVICE MEMBERS, SENIOR
CITIZENS, STUDENTS, OR RESIDENTS OF A CERTAIN AREA BASED ON PUBLICLY
DISCLOSED ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA; OR
C. OFFERED THROUGH A LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR
REWARDS PROGRAM THAT IS PUBLICLY OFFERED TO ALL CONSUMERS WHO
AFFIRMATIVELY CONSENT TO THE PROGRAM;
3. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON COSTS OR
DIFFERENCES IN SUPPLY OR DEMAND ASSOCIATED WITH PROVIDING OR SELLING A
GOOD OR SERVICE IN DIFFERENT LOCATIONS OR GEOGRAPHIES;
4. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE AVAILABILITY OR SUPPLY OF THE GOOD OR SERVICE;
5. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER THROUGH A
LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS PROGRAM IN WHICH ANY CONSUMER MAY
VOLUNTARILY ENROLL OR CONSENT TO PARTICIPATE;
6. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER IN CONNECTION
WITH A SUBSCRIPTION–BASED CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT;
7. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER WHO CONSENTS
TO PROVIDING PERSONAL DATA OR OTHER INFORMATION IN EXCHANGE FOR
OBTAINING THE PRICE;
– 3 –

Ch. 154 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. 8. 3. A PRICE CORRECTION RESULTING FROM A
PRICING ERROR; OR
5. 9. 4. RESETTING A PRICE FOLLOWING A SYSTEM OR
NETWORK OUTAGE.
(4) (3) (4) “FOOD RETAILER” MEANS A MERCHANT THAT OPERATES A
BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
(I) HAS A MINIMUM OF 15,000 SQUARE FEET; AND
(II) SELLS FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE
TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) (4) (5) “SURVEILLANCE PERSONAL DATA” MEANS CONSUMER
INFORMATION COLLECTED AND TRACKED BY TECHNOLOGICAL METHODS, SYSTEMS,
OR TOOLS, SUCH AS SENSORS, CAMERAS, DEVICE TRACKING, BIOMETRIC
MONITORING, OR OTHER FORMS OF OBSERVATION OR DATA COLLECTION, THAT ARE
CAPABLE OF GATHERING PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION ABOUT A
CONSUMER’S BEHAVIOR, CHARACTERISTICS, LOCATION, OR OTHER PERSONAL
ATTRIBUTES, WHETHER IN A PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL ENVIRONMENT HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) (6) “PROTECTED CLASS DATA” MEANS INFORMATION ABOUT AN
INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP OF INDIVIDUALS THAT, ALONE OR IN COMBINATION,
DIRECTLY OR BY IMPLICATION IDENTIFIES A CHARACTERISTIC THAT IS LEGALLY
PROTECTED FROM DISCRIMINATION UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR UNDER
FEDERAL LAW.
(7) (I) “THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE PROVIDER”
MEANS A MERCHANT THAT PROVIDES FACILITATES AS A CONSUMER SERVICE THE
DELIVERY OF FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE TAX IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) “THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE PROVIDER” DOES
NOT INCLUDE A FOOD RETAILER.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) USING PROMOTIONAL PRICING OFFERS, LOYALTY PROGRAM
BENEFITS, OR OTHER TEMPORARY DISCOUNTS OR CHANGES TO PRICING RELATED
TO RETENTION OF EXISTING CUSTOMERS;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 154
(II) SETTING A DIFFERENT PRICE BASED ON OBJECTIVE COSTS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO PROVIDING CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES TO DIFFERENT
CONSUMERS, SUCH AS A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE CAUSED BY SHIPPING COSTS OR
TAXES BASED ON A CONSUMER’S PHYSICAL LOCATION;
(III) SETTING A DIFFERENT PRICE BASED ON COSTS OR
DIFFERENCES IN SUPPLY OR DEMAND ASSOCIATED WITH PROVIDING OR SELLING A
GOOD OR SERVICE IN DIFFERENT LOCATIONS OR GEOGRAPHIES;
(IV) SETTING A DIFFERENT PRICE BASED ON COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE AVAILABILITY OR SUPPLY OF THE GOOD OR SERVICE;
(V) OFFERING A PRICE TO A CONSUMER THROUGH A LOYALTY,
MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS PROGRAM IN WHICH ANY CONSUMER MAY VOLUNTARILY
ENROLL OR CONSENT TO PARTICIPATE;
(VI) OFFERING A PRICE TO A CONSUMER IN CONNECTION WITH A
SUBSCRIPTION–BASED CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT;
(VII) OFFERING A PRICE TO A CONSUMER WHO CONSENTS TO
PROVIDING PERSONAL DATA OR OTHER INFORMATION IN EXCHANGE FOR
OBTAINING THE PRICE;
(VIII) CORRECTING A PRICE RESULTING FROM A PRICING ERROR;
OR
(IX) RESETTING A PRICE FOLLOWING A SYSTEM OR NETWORK
OUTAGE.
(2) A FOOD RETAILER OR THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY NOT ENGAGE:
(1) (I) ENGAGE IN DYNAMIC PRICING TO SET A HIGHER PRICE FOR
FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALE AND USE TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE FOR A SPECIFIC CONSUMER; OR USE
(2) (II) USE SURVEILLANCE PERSONAL DATA TO SET A HIGHER
PRICE FOR CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALE
AND USE TAX UNDER § 11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE FOR A SINGLE
CONSUMER OR A GROUP OF CONSUMERS.
– 5 –

Ch. 154 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) A FOOD RETAILER OR THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY NOT USE PROTECTED CLASS DATA TO OFFER, ADVERTISE, OR SELL
A CONSUMER GOOD OR SERVICE TO A CONSUMER FOR WHOM THE PROTECTED CLASS
DATA PERTAINS IF THE USE OF THE PROTECTED CLASS DATA HAS THE EFFECT OF
WITHHOLDING OR DENYING FROM THE CONSUMER AN ACCOMMODATION, AN
ADVANTAGE, OR A PRIVILEGE ACCORDED TO OTHERS.
(D) (1) BEFORE INITIATING AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER SUBTITLE
4 OF THIS TITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL ISSUE A
NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR.
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR 45 DAYS
AFTER THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION IS RECEIVED TO CURE THE VIOLATION.
(3) IF THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR CURES THE VIOLATION WITHIN THE
TIME PERIOD SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DIVISION MAY NOT INITIATE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE A PRIVATE
RIGHT OF ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION OR ANY OTHER LAW.
13–322.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS DISCLOSURE” MEANS DISCLOSURE:
(I) IN THE SAME MEDIUM AS, AND PROVIDED ON, AT, OR NEAR
AND CONTEMPORANEOUS WITH, EACH COMMUNICATION OF A PRICE FOR WHICH
NOTICE IS REQUIRED; AND
(II) USING LETTERING AND WORDING THAT IS EASILY VISIBLE
AND UNDERSTANDABLE TO A CONSUMER.
(3) “COMMUNICATION” MEANS A DISPLAY, AN IMAGE, AN OFFER, OR
AN ANNOUNCEMENT.
(4) “DYNAMIC PRICING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–321 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 154
(5) “PERSONAL DATA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) CONDUCT OF A MERCHANT THAT IS REGULATED UNDER THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(2) CONDUCT OF A FOOD RETAILER OR THIRD–PARTY FOOD
DELIVERY SERVICE PROVIDER SUBJECT TO § 13–321 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) (I) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS ARTICLE; OR
(II) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION OR AN AFFILIATE OF A
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT IS SUBJECT TO TITLE V OF THE
GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT; OR
(4) A LOWER PRICE THAT IS OFFERED TO A CONSUMER WHO IS AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE MERCHANT.
(C) A MERCHANT MAY NOT SET THE PRICE OF A CONSUMER GOOD OR
SERVICE USING DYNAMIC PRICING OR PERSONAL DATA AND DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE OR PROMOTE, INCLUDE ON A LABEL, OR PUBLISH ANY
OTHER COMMUNICATION CONTAINING THE PRICE, UNLESS THE MERCHANT
INCLUDES WITH THE ADVERTISEMENT, PROMOTION, LABEL, OR OTHER
COMMUNICATION A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS DISCLOSURE WITH THE FOLLOWING
STATEMENT:
“THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM OR BY USING YOUR
PERSONAL DATA”.
(D) (1) BEFORE INITIATING AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER SUBTITLE
4 OF THIS TITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL ISSUE A
NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR.
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR 45 DAYS
AFTER THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION IS RECEIVED TO CURE THE VIOLATION.
(3) IF THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR CURES THE VIOLATION WITHIN THE
TIME PERIOD SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DIVISION MAY NOT INITIATE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
– 7 –

Ch. 154 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
13–408.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A VIOLATION OF § 13–321 OR §
13–322 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) In addition to any action by the Division or Attorney General authorized by
this title and any other action otherwise authorized by law, any person may bring an action
to recover for injury or loss sustained by him as the result of a practice prohibited by this
title.
[(b)] (C) Any person who brings an action to recover for injury or loss under this
section and who is awarded damages may also seek, and the court may award, reasonable
attorney’s fees.
[(c)] (D) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court, at any time, that an action
is brought in bad faith or is of a frivolous nature, the court may order the offending party
to pay to the other party reasonable attorney’s fees.
[(d)] (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person may not
bring an action under this section to recover for injuries sustained as a result of the
professional services provided by a health care provider, as defined in § 3–2A–01 of the
Courts Article.
13–411.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A VIOLATION OF § 13–321 OR §
13–322 OF THIS TITLE.
[(a)] (B) Except as provided in subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, any person
who violates any provision of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and, unless another
criminal penalty is specifically provided elsewhere, on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding one year or both, in addition to any civil
penalties.
[(b)] (C) A person may not be imprisoned for violation of any provision of an
order of the Attorney General or an agreement of a party relating to unit pricing under
Title 14, Subtitle 1 of this article.
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(w) (1) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 154
(2) “Personal data” does not include:
(i) De–identified data; or
(ii) Publicly available information.
Article – Labor and Employment
4–406.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FOOD RETAILER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
13–321 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) A FOOD RETAILER MAY NOT IMPLEMENT AN ADMINISTRATIVE,
OPERATIONAL, OR ORGANIZATIONAL CHANGE THAT DIMINISHES OR IMPAIRS ANY
RIGHT OR BENEFIT GUARANTEED TO EMPLOYEES OF THE FOOD RETAILER UNDER
AN EXISTING COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING UNLESS THE CHANGE IS NEGOTIATED AND MUTUALLY AGREED ON
WITH THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EMPLOYEES.
(C) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION TO RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS
SUSTAINED AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A PERSON WHO BRINGS AN ACTION TO RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS
UNDER THIS SECTION AND WHO IS AWARDED DAMAGES MAY ALSO SEEK, AND THE
COURT MAY AWARD, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(E) IF IT APPEARS TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE COURT, AT ANY TIME,
THAT AN ACTION IS BROUGHT IN BAD FAITH OR IS OF A FRIVOLOUS NATURE, THE
COURT MAY ORDER THE OFFENDING PARTY TO PAY TO THE OTHER PARTY
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
Article – Tax – General
11–206.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the sales and
use tax does not apply to a sale of food for consumption off the premises by a food vendor
who operates a substantial grocery or market business at the same location where the food
is sold.
(2) The exemption under paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to:
– 9 –

Ch. 154 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) food that the vendor serves for consumption on the premises of
the buyer or of a third party; or
(ii) food for immediate consumption.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 10 –